Illinois, session 104th, HB4090.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-9)  (from Ch. 38, par. 12-9)7    Sec. 12-9. Threatening a public official, a officials; 8human service provider, or a teacher, principal, or 9administrator of a public or private elementary or secondary 10school providers. 11    (a) A person commits threatening a public official, a or 12human service provider, or a teacher, principal, or 13administrator of a public or private elementary or secondary 14school when:15        (1) that person knowingly delivers or conveys, 16    directly or indirectly, to a public official, a or human 17    service provider, or a teacher, principal, or 18    administrator of a public or private elementary or 19    secondary school, by any means a communication:20            (i) containing a threat that would place the 21        public official or human service provider or a member 22        of his or her immediate family in reasonable 23        apprehension of immediate or future bodily harm,   HB4090- 2 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1        sexual assault, confinement, or restraint; or2            (ii) containing a threat that would place the 3        public official or human service provider or a member 4        of his or her immediate family in reasonable 5        apprehension that damage will occur to property in the 6        custody, care, or control of the public official or 7        his or her immediate family;8            (iii) containing a threat that would place the 9        teacher, principal, or administrator of a public or 10        private elementary or secondary school in reasonable 11        apprehension of immediate or future bodily harm, 12        sexual assault, confinement, or restraint; or13            (iv) containing a threat that would place the 14        teacher, principal, or administrator of a public or 15        private elementary or secondary school in reasonable 16        apprehension that damage will occur to property in the 17        custody, care, or control of the teacher, principal, 18        or administrator of a public or private elementary or 19        secondary school; and20        (2) the threat was conveyed because of the performance 21    or nonperformance of some public duty or duty as a human 22    service provider, or as a teacher, principal, or 23    administrator of a public or private elementary or 24    secondary school, because of hostility of the person 25    making the threat toward the status or position of the 26    public official, or the human service provider, or the   HB4090- 3 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    teacher, principal, or administrator of a public or 2    private elementary or secondary school, or because of any 3    other factor related to the official's public existence.4    (a-5) For purposes of a threat to a sworn law enforcement 5officer, the threat must contain specific facts indicative of 6a unique threat to the person, family or property of the 7officer and not a generalized threat of harm. 8    (a-6) For purposes of a threat to a social worker, 9caseworker, investigator, or human service provider, the 10threat must contain specific facts indicative of a unique 11threat to the person, family or property of the individual and 12not a generalized threat of harm. 13    (b) For purposes of this Section:14        (1) "Public official" means a person who is elected to 15    office in accordance with a statute or who is appointed to 16    an office which is established, and the qualifications and 17    duties of which are prescribed, by statute, to discharge a 18    public duty for the State or any of its political 19    subdivisions or in the case of an elective office any 20    person who has filed the required documents for nomination 21    or election to such office. "Public official" includes a 22    duly appointed assistant State's Attorney, assistant 23    Attorney General, or Appellate Prosecutor; a sworn law 24    enforcement or peace officer; a social worker, caseworker, 25    attorney, or investigator employed by the Department of 26    Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of Human   HB4090- 4 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    Services, the Department of Children and Family Services, 2    or the Guardianship and Advocacy Commission; or an 3    assistant public guardian, attorney, social worker, case 4    manager, or investigator employed by a duly appointed 5    public guardian.6        (1.5) "Human service provider" means a social worker, 7    case worker, or investigator employed by an agency or 8    organization providing social work, case work, or 9    investigative services under a contract with or a grant 10    from the Department of Human Services, the Department of 11    Children and Family Services, the Department of Healthcare 12    and Family Services, or the Department on Aging. 13        (2) "Immediate family" means a public official's 14    spouse or child or children.15    (c) Threatening a public official, a or human service 16provider, or a teacher, principal, or administrator of a 17public or private elementary or secondary school is a Class 3 18felony for a first offense and a Class 2 felony for a second or 19subsequent offense.20(Source: P.A. 100-1, eff. 1-1-18.) 21    Section 10. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 22amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 23    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)24    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release.   HB4090- 5 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 2hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 3if:4        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 5    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 6    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 7    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 8    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 9    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 10    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 11    or persons or the community, based on the specific 12    articulable facts of the case;13        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 14    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 15    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 16    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 17    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 18    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 19    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 20    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 21    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 22    of force against another person, residential burglary, 23    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 24    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 25    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 26    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the   HB4090- 6 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 2    disability or disfigurement; 3        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 4    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 5    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 6    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 7    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 8    of the threat upon which the charge is based;9        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 10    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 11    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 12    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 13    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or of a civil no contact 14    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 15    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 16    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 17    or persons or the community, based on the specific 18    articulable facts of the case;19        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 20    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 21    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 22    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 23    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 24    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 25    case;26        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under   HB4090- 7 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 2    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 3    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 4    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 5    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 6    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 7    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 8    the case; 9        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 10    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 11    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 12    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 13    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 14    of the case:15            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 16        firearm);17            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 24-2.5 (aggravated discharge 18        of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 19        designed or used use for silencing the report of a 20        firearm);21            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 22        firearm);23            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 24        firearm by a repeat felony offender);25            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 26        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing   HB4090- 8 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 2        or flechette shells);3            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 4        firearms);5            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 6        firearms on the premises of any school);7            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 8        liquor license);9            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 10        firearm);11            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);12            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);13            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);14            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 15        of a minor);16            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);17            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 18        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 19        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 20        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 21        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 22        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 23            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 24        manslaughter);25            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);26            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);  HB4090- 9 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 2        endangerment);3            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 4            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 5        restraint); 6            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official, a 7        human service provider, or a teacher, principal, or 8        administrator of a public or private elementary or 9        secondary school); 10            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 11        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 12        discharge of a firearm); 13        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 14    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 15    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 16    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 17    the specific articulable facts of the case: 18            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 19        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 20        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);21            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 22        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 23        influence while operating a school bus with 24        passengers);25            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 26        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the   HB4090- 10 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1        influence causing great bodily harm);2            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 3        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 4        influence after a previous reckless homicide 5        conviction);6            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence leading to death); or9            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 10        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 11        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 12        under the age of 16);13        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 14    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 15    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 16    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 17    persons or the community, based on the specific 18    articulable facts of the case; or 19        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 20    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:21            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 22        through (a)(7) of this Section; or23            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 24    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 25detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 26probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless   HB4090- 11 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 2been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 3indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 4probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 5finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 6misdemeanor.7    (c) Timing of petition. 8        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 9    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 10    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 11    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 12    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 13    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 14    previously released shall not be detained.15        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 16    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 17    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 18    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 19    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 20    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 21    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 22    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 23    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 24    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 25    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 26    filing of the petition and the hearing.  HB4090- 12 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    (d) Contents of petition.2        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 3    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 4    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 5    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 6    persons or the community, based on the specific 7    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.8        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 9    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 10    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 11    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 12    filing of the previous petition.13    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 14for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 15proving by clear and convincing evidence that:16        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 17    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 18    subsection (a), and19        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 20    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 21    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 22    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 23    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 24    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 25    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 26    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of   HB4090- 13 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    1986, and2        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 3    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 4    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 5    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 6    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 7    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 8    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 9    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and10        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 11    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 12    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 13    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 14    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 15    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 16    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 17    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 18    appear in court as required.19    (f) Conduct of the hearings.20        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 21    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 22    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 23    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 24    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 25    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 26    hearing.  HB4090- 14 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 2    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.3        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 4    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 5    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 6    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 7    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 8    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 9    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 10    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 11    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 12    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 13    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 14    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 15    conducted via a 2-way two-way audio-visual communication 16    system, such consultation shall not be recorded and shall 17    be undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 18        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 19    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 20    two-way audio visual communication) unless the accused 21    waives the right to be present physically in court, the 22    court determines that the physical health and safety of 23    any person necessary to the proceedings would be 24    endangered by appearing in court, or the chief judge of 25    the circuit orders use of that system due to operational 26    challenges in conducting the hearing in person. Such   HB4090- 15 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    operational challenges must be documented and approved by 2    the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 3    challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented 4    and approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois 5    Courts every 6 months. 6        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 7    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 8    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 9    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 10    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 11    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 12    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 13    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 14    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 15    the court shall state on the record the reason for 16    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 17    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 18    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 19    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 20    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 21    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 22    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 23    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 24    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 25    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 26    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The   HB4090- 16 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 2    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 3    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 4    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 5    criminal history, if available, and any written or 6    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 7    statements made by any person, if in the State's 8    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 9        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 10    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 11    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 12    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 13    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 14    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 15    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 16    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 17    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.18        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 19    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 20    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 21    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 22    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 23    the defendant.24        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 25    release, and detention prior to trial must be 26    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be   HB4090- 17 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 2    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 3    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 4dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 5defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 6person or persons or the community, based on the specific 7articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 8limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:9        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 10    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 11    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.12        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 13    including:14            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 15        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 16        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 17        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 18        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 19        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.20            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 21        psychiatric or other similar social history which 22        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 23        nature, or lack of any such history.24        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 25    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 26    nature of the threat.  HB4090- 18 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 2    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 3    them.4        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.5        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 6    complaining witness. 7        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 8    access to any weapon or weapons.9        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 10    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 11    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 12    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 13    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 14    federal or State state law.15        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 16    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 17    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 18    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 19    or lack of such behavior.20    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 21detention:22        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 23    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 24    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 25    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 26    the safety of any person or persons or the community,   HB4090- 19 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 2    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;3        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 4    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 5    pending trial;6        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 7    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 8    communication with others of his or her choice by 9    visitation, mail and telephone; and10        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 11    required for appearances in connection with court 12    proceedings.13    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 14detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 15Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 16offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 17on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 18is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 19the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 20release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 21any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 22the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 23from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 24good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.25    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 26before the court, the judge must find that continued detention   HB4090- 20 -LRB104 14342 RLC 27475 b1is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 2of any person or persons or the community, based on the 3specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 4defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 5    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 6entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 7denying his or her pretrial release.8    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 9this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 10release.11    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 12shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 13defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 14proceedings.15    (m) Interest of victims. 16        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 17    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 18    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 19    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 20    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 21        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 22    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 23    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 24    defendant remains in custody. 25(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 26revised 10-23-24.)